Illinois, session 104th, HB4438.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Designations Act is amended by adding 5Section 17 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 460/17 new)7    Sec. 17. State bee. The bumblebee Bombus auricomus, 8commonly known as the "Black-and-Gold Bumblebee", is 9designated as the official State bee of the State of Illinois.